District of Columbia statutes.
47-2851.03c

Agencies’ power to inspect and revoke licensure.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed as limiting or reassigning any District agency’s power to inspect for compliance or to revoke licensure. Agencies of the District government responsible for the issuance of license endorsements shall revoke, deny, or suspend any license endorsements and issue fines as required by statute or regulation.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2002(f), 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2851.3c.

Short Title

Short title of title II of Law 12-261: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-2851.03a.